Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3547
Administrator; appointment; determination; filings.

Upon receipt of the order of the district court referring the community improvement district to the city council of the city or board of trustees of the village in which the community improvement district is located for the appointment of an administrator, the city council or village board of trustees shall appoint an administrator with authority, including all authority of the board of trustees, chairperson, and clerk of the community improvement district, to direct the affairs of the community improvement district pursuant to the Community Improvement District Act unless the city council or village board of trustees shall determine upon good cause that the appointment of an administrator would not be in the best interests of the community improvement district. Within sixty days after receipt of such order of the district court, the city council or village board of trustees shall file with the court a certificate evidencing compliance with this section and if the city council or village board of trustees determines not to appoint an administrator, such certificate shall specify the grounds for the city council's or village board of trustees' determination that the appointment would not be in the best interest of the community improvement district.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 47.
April 17, 2026